pt-BR: Equilíbrio da raquete: Equilíbrio uniforme; Cabeça pesada; Cabeça leve; Outro
lt-LT: Raketės balansas: Tolygus balansas; Svoris į priekį; Svoris į kotą; Kita
hu: Ütő egyensúlya: Kiegyensúlyozott; Fejnehéz; Fejkönnyű; Egyéb
ro-RO: Echilibrul rachetei: Echilibru uniform; Grea pe cap; Ușoară pe cap; Altele
fi: Mailan painopiste: Tasapainotettu; Raskas kärki; Kevyt kärki; Muu
sk-SK: Rovnomerné vyváženie rakety: Rovnováha; Ťažká hlava; Ľahká hlava; Iné
sl-SI: Ravnovesje loparja: Enakomerno ravnovesje; Težka glava; Lahka glava; Drugo
it: Equilibrio della racchetta: Equilibrio uniforme; Head-heavy; Head-light; Altro
zh-CN: 球拍平衡: 均衡型; 头重型; 头轻型; 其他
en: Racket balance: Even balance; Head-heavy; Head-light; Other
ko: 라켓 밸런스: 균등 균형; 머리-무거움; 전조등; 기타
nb: Racketbalanse: Jevn balanse; Head heavy; Head light; Annet
zh-TW: 球拍平衡: 均勻平衡; 頭重; 頭輕; 其他
cs: Vyvážení rakety: Vyvážená; Head Heavy; Head Light; Jiné
th: ความสมดุลของแร็กเกต: สมดุลสม่ำเสมอ; หัวหนัก; หัวเบา; อื่นๆ
sv: Rackbalans: Jämn balans; Tung i överdel; Lätt i överdel; Övrigt
vi: Cân bằng vợt: Cân bằng đều; Đầu nặng; Đầu nhẹ; Khác
ru: Баланс ракетки: Равномерный баланс; Для большой нагрузки; Для небольшой нагрузки; Другой
bg-BG: Баланс на ракета: Равномерен баланс; Тежка глава; Лека глава; Други
pt-PT: Equilíbrio da raquete: Equilíbrio uniforme; Cabeça pesada; Cabeça leve; Outro
de: Gewichtsverteilung beim Schläger: Ausgeglichenes Gleichgewicht; Kopflastig; Kopfleicht; Sonstiges
tr: Raket dengesi: Eşit denge; Başı ağır; Başı hafif; Diğer
ja: ラケットバランス: 均衡バランス; ヘッドヘビー; ヘッドライト; その他
el: Ισορροπία ρακέτας: Ισορροπημένο βάρους; Βαρειά κεφαλή; Ελαφριά κεφαλή; Άλλο
fr: Équilibre de la raquette: Équilibre en tête; Tête lourde; Tête légère; Autre
pl: Balans rakiety: Równomiernie wyważona; Ciężka w główce; Lekka w główce; Inne
es: Equilibrio de raqueta: Equilibrio uniforme; Cabeza pesada; Cabeza ligera; Otros
hr-HR: Ravnoteža reketa: Ravnomjerna ravnoteža; Teška glava; Lagana glava; Ostalo
nl: Balans van het racket: Evenwicht; Kopzwaar; Koplamp; Andere
da: Ketsjerbalance: Jævn balance; Hovedtung; Hovedlet; Andet